District of Columbia statutes.
21-2209

Health-care provider limitation.

(a)

No health-care provider may require an individual to execute a durable power of attorney for health care as a condition for the provision of health-care services or admission to a health-care facility, as defined in § 44-501.

(b)

After an individual has spent at least 48 hours in a health care facility, a health care provider may request the individual to execute a durable power of attorney for health care subject to the limitations set forth in this chapter. The health care provider may not be named as the attorney in fact.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-189, § 10, 35 DCR 8653
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 23(j), 40 DCR 6311

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-2209.